Hawaii statutes.
§373-19 Powers and duties. In addition
to any other powers and duties authorized by law, the director may adopt,
amend, or repeal such rules as the director may deem proper to fully effectuate
this chapter and may delegate to the executive officer or other designee any
powers or duties the director deems reasonable and proper. [L 1959, c 264, pt
of §3; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §27; Supp, §88A-19; HRS §373-19; am L 1980, c 302,
pt of §2; am L 1983, c 84, §1(5); am L 1992, c 202, §5; am L 2002, c 22, §11]

Cross References

Rules, see chapter 91 and §371-7.

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next